Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Procedural Provisions

407.330.
Competency of evidence of husband and wife. [Repealed.]

407.340.
Rules of evidence. [Repealed.]

407.350.
Application of payments. [Repealed.]

407.360.
Effect of participation in proceedings. [Repealed.]

407.370.
Extradition — Governor may require Commonwealth’s attorney to investigate before demand. [Repealed.]

407.380.
Continuance — By either party. [Repealed.]

407.390.
Immunity from self-incrimination. [Repealed.]

407.400.
Evidence — Civil rules to apply. [Repealed.]

407.410.
Nonpaternity as a defense — Adjudication of paternity issue. [Repealed.]

407.420.
Effect of pending or prior actions or proceedings on actions under this chapter. [Repealed.]

407.430.
Jurisdiction — Both parties resident of this state — Different counties. [Repealed.]

407.440.
Appeal by secretary for health and family services — When.

If the secretary for health and family services or his authorized representative is of the opinion that a support order is erroneous and presents a question of law warranting an appeal in the public interest, he may perfect an appeal to the proper appellate court if the support order was issued by a court of this state, or if the support order was issued in another state, cause the appeal to be taken in the other state. In either case, expenses of appeal may be paid on his order from funds appropriated for his office.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 158, § 19; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(19); 1998, ch. 426, § 591, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 639, effective June 20, 2005.